Maine, session 132, LD241.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §6115 is enacted to read:
§6115. Low-income assistance
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a water utility or group of water
utilities may petition the commission for approval of a low-income assistance program to
allow a qualifying low-income residential ratepayer to receive a discount or credit applying
to the amount the residential ratepayer would otherwise owe to the water utility. The
commission may approve the proposed discount or credit if it determines that the proposal
is a cost-effective means of keeping water affordable for low-income residential ratepayers.
The commission may not require a water utility to initiate a low-income assistance program
pursuant to this section.
For the purposes of this section, "residential ratepayer" means a customer who is
considered residential under the terms and conditions of the water utility.
Page 1 - 132LR0540(03)